Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2921YC (2) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.266, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 2. The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting 3 in injury to or death of any person, or total property damage 4 to an apparent extent of one seven thousand five hundred 5 dollars or more , shall , within seventy-two hours after the 6 accident, forward a written report of the accident to the 7 department within seventy-two hours after the accident . 8 However, such report is not required when if the accident is 9 investigated by a law enforcement agency. 10 3. Every law enforcement officer who, in the regular course 11 of duty, investigates a motor vehicle accident of which report 12 must be made as required in subsections 1 and 2 , either at 13 the time of and at the scene of the accident or thereafter 14 by interviewing participants or witnesses shall , within 15 twenty-four hours after completing such investigation, forward 16 a written report of such accident to the department. 17